Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2847.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-779, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-779. Amount of benefits A. The weekly benefit amount of an individual shall be an amount equal to 1/25 of the person's total wages for insured work paid during that quarter of the person's base period in which such total wages were highest, but if: 1. From and after June 30, 2004 and before July 1, 2022, this amount is more than $240, the weekly benefit amount shall be $240. 2. From and after June 30, 2022, this amount is more than $320, the weekly benefit amount shall be $320 $500. B. If the weekly benefit amount is less than the maximum weekly benefit prescribed in subsection A of this section and is not a multiple of $1, the amount shall be rounded to the nearest dollar, with an even one-half dollar being rounded to the next higher multiple of $1. An individual's benefit amount shall not be redetermined during the person's benefit year because of a new maximum or minimum weekly benefit amount becoming effective during the person's benefit year. C. Each eligible individual who is unemployed with respect to any week shall be paid with respect to that week a benefit in an amount equal to the individual's weekly benefit amount less that part of the wages, if any, payable to the individual with respect to that week that is in excess of $30 through June 30, 2022 and from and after June 30, 2022 that is in excess of $160.  The benefit, if not a multiple of $1, shall be rounded to the nearest dollar, with an even one-half dollar being rounded to the next higher multiple of $1. END_STATUTE